Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-207
County seat; location; void election; resubmission.

In any county where an election has been held to determine the permanent location of the county seat of such county, and the election shall be declared void by any court of competent jurisdiction in an action instituted for that purpose, the county board of said county shall submit the question of locating the county seat to the qualified voters of the county at the next general election to be held sixty days after the entering of such judgment, as if no election had ever been held in such county.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 82, p. 229;

Laws 1883, c. 24, § 1, p. 185;

R.S.1913, § 918;

C.S.1922, § 824;

C.S.1929, § 25-207.